tests/vowel-harmony.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Back rounding harmony":
    къол<n><px1sg><nom> : къолум
    фронт<n><acc> : фронтну
    оху<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : охуду
    тавуш<n><px3sp><nom> : тавушу

  "[twol] Front rounding harmony words with оь and уь":
    оьр<n><loc> : оьрде
    оьр<n><px3sp><loc> : оьрюнде
    оьл<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : оьле
    оьл<v><iv><ifi><p3><sg> : оьлдю
    оьл<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : оьлген
    оьз<prn><ref><px3sp><nom> : оьзю 

  "[twol] Front rounding harmony words with ё and ю":
    гёр<v><tv><pass><gpr_impf> : гёрюлеген

  "[twol] Russian words with what look like front vowels but aren't":
    режиссёр<n><pl><nom> : режиссёрлар
    режиссёр<n><px3sp><nom> : режиссёру
    актёр<n><pl><nom> : актёрлар
    актёр<n><px3sp><nom> : актёру

  "[twol] Russian words with front vowels that get back harmony":
    центр<n><pl><nom> : центрлар
    центр<n><px3sp><nom> : центры
    центр<n><dat> : центргъа
    тигр<n><nom> : тигр
    тигр<n><pl><nom> : тигрлар
    тигр<n><px3sp><nom> : тигры
    тигр<n><dat> : тигргъа
    семестр<n><pl><nom> : семестрлар

  "[twol] Russian words with back vowels that get back harmony":
    автор<n><px3sp><nom> : автору
    жанр<n><pl><nom> : жанрлар
    кадр<n><pl><nom> : кадрлар
    театр<n><pl><nom> : театрлар

  "[twol] Russian words with front vowels that get front harmony":
    процент<n><pl><nom> : процентлер
    процент<n><px3sp><nom> : проценти
    процент<n><dat> : процентге
    концерт<n><pl><nom> : концертлер
    концерт<n><px3sp><nom> : концерти
    концерт<n><dat> : концертге
    реализм<n><pl><nom> : реализмлер
    реализм<n><px3sp><nom> : реализми
    реализм<n><dat> : реализмге
    проект<n><pl><nom> : проектлер
    проект<n><px3sp><nom> : проекти
    проект<n><dat> : проектге
    министр<n><pl><nom> : министрлер
    министр<n><px3sp><nom> : министри
    шедевр<n><pl><nom> : шедеврлер
    метр<n><pl><nom> : метрлер
    арбитр<n><pl><nom> : арбитрлер

  "[lexc] Russian words with front and back":
    оркестр<n><pl><nom> : оркестрлер
    оркестр<n><pl><nom> : оркестрлар

  "[twol] abbreviations":
    СССР<np><top><acc> : СССР-ни

  "[twol] Words that look like front-vowel words but aren't":
    дюнья<n><nom> : дюнья
    дюнья<n><dat> : дюньягъа
    дюнья<n><acc> : дюньяны
  
